Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [3B.001] LEGISLATIVE REFERRAL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin "Measure" means a proposal to amend one or more existing laws, create one or more new laws, or repeal one or more laws, all related to one general subject. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Referral. new text end new text begin A majority of the members elected to each house of the legislature may pass a bill or resolution that directs the secretary of state to place the measure on the ballot for the next general election for adoption or rejection by a majority vote of those voting. If a majority of the voters voting on the referred measure approve the measure's adoption, the measure is enacted into law. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Publication. new text end new text begin Referred measures adopted by the people must be published by the revisor of statutes in Laws of Minnesota and codified like other laws. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end